Tennessee, session 114, SB2571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-418, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(h)
(1) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, and in recognition of the
United States president's executive order rescheduling cannabis from Schedule I
to Schedule III under federal law, it is an offense for any person to knowingly
possess cannabis unless such substance was obtained directly from or pursuant
to a diagnosis of a qualifying medical condition, as defined in § 68-7-101, made
by a physician licensed under title 63, chapter 6 or chapter 9.
(2) A violation of this subsection (h) with respect to cannabis,
tetrahydrocannabinol, or chemical derivatives thereof, is a Class A misdemeanor
and must be punished as follows:
(A)
(i) For a violation in which the person possesses one (1)
ounce or less, the court may impose a fine of not more than one
hundred dollars ($100), require the person to perform up to ten
(10) hours of community service, or both. The court may not
impose a period of confinement for possession of one (1) ounce or
less of cannabis.
SB2571
011907
- 1 -

(ii) If a person upon whom a fine has been imposed under
this subdivision (h)(2)(A) alleges indigency or otherwise fails to
pay the fine, then the court shall determine whether the person
has willfully refused to pay or has made bona fide efforts to legally
acquire resources to pay. If the person has not willfully refused to
pay and has made bona fide efforts to attempt to pay the fine
imposed, then the court shall use its discretion regarding
alternatives, including installment payments or additional
community service.
(iii) An officer enforcing this subsection (h) must issue the
person a citation in lieu of custodial arrest, pursuant to § 40-7-118.
(B) For a violation in which the person possesses more than one (1)
ounce but less than one-half (1/2) pound, the court may impose a fine of not
more than five hundred dollars ($500), require the person to perform up to forty
(40) hours of community service, or both.
(C) For second violation in which the person possesses more than one
(1) ounce but less than one-half (1/2) pound, the court may impose a fine of not
more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), a period of confinement of not more
than thirty (30) days, or both.
(D) For a third or subsequent violation in which the person possesses
more than one (1) ounce but less than one-half (1/2) pound, the court may
impose a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), a
period of confinement of not more than more than six (6) months, or both.
- 2 - 011907

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to offenses occurring on or after that date and offenses for which prosecution is
initiated on or after that date.
- 3 - 011907